Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB204.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 508.090 is amended to read as follows:
As used[The following definitions apply] in KRS 508.100 to 508.120 unless the context
requires otherwise[otherwise requires]:
(1) "Abuse or neglect" means
(a) The infliction of:
1. Physical pain[,] or injury, including ingestion or inhalation of a
controlled substance; or
2. Mental injury;[,] or
(b) The deprivation of services by a person which are necessary to maintain the
health and welfare of a person, or a situation in which an adult, living alone, is
unable to provide or obtain for himself or herself the services which are
necessary to maintain his or her health or welfare;[. ]
(2) "Controlled substance" has the same meaning as in KRS 218A.010; and
(3) "Physically helpless" and "mentally helpless" means a person who lacks substantial
capacity to defend himself or herself or solicit protection from law enforcement
agencies.
Section 2. KRS 508.100 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of criminal abuse or neglect in the first degree when he or she
intentionally abuses or neglects another person or permits another person of whom
he or she has actual custody to be abused or neglected and thereby:
(a) Causes serious physical injury;
(b) Places him or her in a situation that may cause him or her serious physical
injury; or
(c) Causes torture, cruel confinement, or cruel punishment;
to a person under thirteen (13) years old[twelve (12) years of age or less], or who
Page 1 of 56
XXXX 2/17/2026 11:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1747
is physically helpless or mentally helpless.
(2) Criminal abuse or neglect in the first degree is a Class C felony unless the victim is
under twelve (12) years old, in which case it is a Class B felony.
Section 3. KRS 508.110 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of criminal abuse or neglect in the second degree when he or she
wantonly abuses or neglects another person or permits another person of whom he
or she has actual custody to be abused or neglected and thereby:
(a) Causes serious physical injury; or
(b) Places him or her in a situation that may cause him or her serious physical
injury; or
(c) Causes torture, cruel confinement, or cruel punishment;
to a person under thirteen (13) years old[twelve (12) years of age or less], or who
is physically helpless or mentally helpless.
(2) Criminal abuse or neglect in the second degree is a Class D felony.
Section 4. KRS 508.120 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of criminal abuse or neglect in the third degree when he or she
recklessly abuses or neglects another person or permits another person of whom he
or she has actual custody to be abused or neglected and thereby:
(a) Causes serious physical injury; or
(b) Places him or her in a situation that may cause him or her serious physical
injury; or
(c) Causes torture, cruel confinement, or cruel punishment;
to a person under thirteen (13) years old[twelve (12) years of age or less], or who
is physically helpless or mentally helpless.
(2) Criminal abuse or neglect in the third degree is a Class A misdemeanor unless the
person is under thirteen (13) years old and the person has suffered serious
physical injury by the ingestion or inhalation of a controlled substance, in which
Page 2 of 56
XXXX 2/17/2026 11:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1747
case it is a Class D felony.
Section 5. KRS 15.440 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Each unit of government that meets the following requirements shall be eligible to
share in the distribution of funds from the Law Enforcement Foundation Program
fund:
(a) Employs one (1) or more police officers;
(b) Pays every police officer at least the minimum federal wage;
(c) Requires all police officers to have, at a minimum, a high school degree, or its
equivalent as determined by the council, except that each police officer
employed prior to the date on which the officer's police department was
included as a participant under KRS 15.410 to 15.510 shall be deemed to have
met the requirements of this subsection;
(d) 1. Requires all police officers to successfully complete a basic training
course of nine hundred twenty-eight (928) hours' duration within one (1)
year of the date of employment at a school certified or recognized by the
council, which may provide a different number of hours of instruction as
established in this paragraph, except that each police officer employed
prior to the date on which the officer's police department was included
as a participant under KRS 15.410 to 15.510 shall be deemed to have
met the requirements of this subsection.
2. As the exclusive method by which the number of hours required for
basic training courses shall be modified from that which is specifically
established by this paragraph, the council may, by the promulgation of
administrative regulations in accordance with the provisions of KRS
Chapter 13A, explicitly set the exact number of hours for basic training
at a number different from nine hundred twenty-eight (928) hours based
upon a training curriculum approved by the Kentucky Law Enforcement
Page 3 of 56
XXXX 2/17/2026 11:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1747
Council as determined by a validated job task analysis.
3. If the council sets an exact number of hours different from nine hundred
twenty-eight (928) in an administrative regulation as provided by this
paragraph, it shall not further change the number of hours required for
basic training without promulgating administrative regulations in
accordance with the provisions of KRS Chapter 13A.
4. Nothing in this paragraph shall be interpreted to prevent the council,
pursuant to its authority under KRS 15.330, from approving training
schools with a curriculum requiring attendance of a number of hours
that exceeds nine hundred twenty-eight (928) hours or the number of
hours established in an administrative regulation as provided by
subparagraphs 2. and 3. of this paragraph. However, the training
programs and schools for the basic training of law enforcement
personnel conducted by the department pursuant to KRS 15A.070 shall
not contain a curriculum that requires attendance of a number of hours
for basic training that is different from nine hundred twenty-eight (928)
hours or the number of hours established in an administrative regulation
promulgated by the council pursuant to the provisions of KRS Chapter
13A as provided by subparagraphs 2. and 3. of this paragraph.
5. KRS 15.400 and 15.404(1) and subparagraphs 1. to 4. of this paragraph
to the contrary notwithstanding, the council may, through the
promulgation of administrative regulations in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A, approve basic training credit for:
a. Years of service credit as a law enforcement officer with previous
service in another state; and
b. Basic training completed in another state.
6. KRS 15.400 and 15.404(1) and subparagraphs 1. to 4. of this paragraph
Page 4 of 56
XXXX 2/17/2026 11:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1747
to the contrary notwithstanding, the council may, through the
promulgation of administrative regulations in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A, approve basic training credit for:
a. Completion of eight hundred forty-eight (848) hours of training at
a school established pursuant to KRS 15A.070;
b. A minimum of fifteen (15) years of experience as a certified law
enforcement instructor at a school established pursuant to KRS
15A.070;
c. Completion of an average of forty (40) hours of Kentucky Law
Enforcement Council approved in-service training annually from
January 1, 1997, through January 1, 2020;
d. Three (3) years of active, full-time service as a:
i. City, county, urban-county, charter county, consolidated
local, or unified local government police officer;
ii. Sheriff's deputy, excluding special deputies appointed under
KRS 70.045;
iii. Department of Kentucky State Police officer; or
iv. Kentucky Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources game
warden exercising peace officer powers under KRS 150.090;
and
e. Completion of the:
i. Twenty-four (24) hour legal update Penal Code course;
ii. Sixteen (16) hour legal update constitutional procedure
course; and
iii. Forty (40) hour basic officer skills course within one (1) year
prior to applying for certification;
(e) Requires all police officers to successfully complete each calendar year an in-
Page 5 of 56
XXXX 2/17/2026 11:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1747
service training course, appropriate to the officer's rank and responsibility and
the size and location of the officer's police department, of forty (40) hours'
duration, at a school certified or recognized by the council which may include
a four (4) hour course which meets the requirements of paragraph (j) of this
subsection. This in-service training requirement shall be waived for the period
of time that a peace officer is serving on active duty in the United States
Armed Forces. This waiver shall be retroactive for peace officers from the
date of September 11, 2001;
(f) Complies with all provisions of law applicable to police officers or police
departments, including:
1. Transmission of data to the centralized criminal history record
information system as required by KRS 17.150; and
2. Transmission of reports as required by KRS 15.391;
(g) Complies with all rules and regulations, appropriate to the size and location of
the police department issued by the cabinet to facilitate the administration of
the fund and further the purposes of KRS 15.410 to 15.510;
(h) Possesses a written policy and procedures manual related to domestic violence
for law enforcement agencies that has been approved by the cabinet. The
policy shall comply with the provisions of KRS 403.715 to 403.785. The
policy shall include:
1. A purpose statement;
2. Definitions;
3. Supervisory responsibilities;
4. Procedures for twenty-four (24) hour access to protective orders;
5. Procedures for enforcement of court orders or relief when protective
orders are violated;
6. Procedures for timely and contemporaneous reporting of adult abuse and
Page 6 of 56
XXXX 2/17/2026 11:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1747
domestic violence to the Cabinet for Health and Family Services,
Department for Community Based Services;
7. Victim rights, assistance, and service responsibilities; and
8. Duties related to timely completion of records;
(i) Possesses[ by January 1, 2023,] a written policy and procedures manual
related to sexual assault examinations that meets the standards provided by,
and has been approved by, the cabinet, and which includes:
1. A requirement that evidence collected as a result of an examination
performed under KRS 216B.400 be taken into custody within five (5)
days of notice from the collecting facility that the evidence is available
for retrieval;
2. A requirement that evidence received from a collecting facility relating
to an incident which occurred outside the jurisdiction of the police
department be transmitted to a police department with jurisdiction
within ten (10) days of its receipt by the police department;
3. A requirement that all evidence retrieved from a collecting facility under
this paragraph be transmitted to the Department of Kentucky State
Police forensic laboratory within thirty (30) days of its receipt by the
police department;
4. A requirement that a suspect standard, if available, be transmitted to the
Department of Kentucky State Police forensic laboratory with the
evidence received from a collecting facility;
5. A process for notifying the victim from whom the evidence was
collected of the progress of the testing, whether the testing resulted in a
match to other DNA samples, and if the evidence is to be destroyed. The
policy may include provisions for delaying notice until a suspect is
apprehended or the office of the Commonwealth's attorney consents to
Page 7 of 56
XXXX 2/17/2026 11:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1747
the notification, but shall not automatically require the disclosure of the
identity of any person to whom the evidence matched; and
6. A requirement that DNA samples collected as a result of an examination
performed under KRS 216B.400 that are voluntarily submitted solely for
elimination purposes shall not be checked against any DNA index,
retained, or included in any DNA index;[ and]
(j) Requires all police officers to successfully complete by December 31, 2022,
and every two (2) years thereafter, a training course certified by the council of
not less than four (4) hours in emergency vehicle operation; and
(k) Possesses by December 1, 2026, a written policy and procedures manual
related to pediatric ingestion or inhalation of controlled substances that
includes a requirement that:
1. In each case where a child is suspected to have ingested or inhaled a
controlled substance as defined in Section 1 of this Act, a police
officer shall seek a search warrant for a urine, blood, or other
appropriate test for the person who was responsible for the supervision
of the child when the controlled substance was ingested or inhaled;
and
2. Any test sought under subparagraph 1. of this paragraph shall test for
the presence of a wide range of substances that include but are not
limited to:
a. Buprenorphine;
b. Fentanyl;
c. Methadone; and
d. Xylazine.
(2) A unit of government which meets the criteria of this section shall be eligible to
continue sharing in the distribution of funds from the Law Enforcement Foundation
Page 8 of 56
XXXX 2/17/2026 11:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1747
Program fund only if the police department of the unit of government remains in
compliance with the requirements of this section.
(3) Deputies employed by a sheriff's office shall be eligible to participate in the
distribution of funds from the Law Enforcement Foundation Program fund
regardless of participation by the sheriff.
(4) Failure to meet a deadline established in a policy adopted pursuant to subsection
(1)(i) of this section for the retrieval or submission of evidence shall not be a basis
for a dismissal of a criminal action or a bar to the admissibility of the evidence in a
criminal action.
Section 6. KRS 620.055 is amended to read as follows:
(1) An external child fatality and near fatality review panel is hereby created and
established for the purpose of conducting comprehensive reviews of child fatalities
and near fatalities, reported to the Cabinet for Health and Family Services,
suspected to be a result of abuse or neglect. The panel shall be attached to the
Justice and Public Safety Cabinet for staff and administrative purposes.
(2) The external child fatality and near fatality review panel shall be composed of the
following five (5) ex officio nonvoting members and seventeen (17) voting
members:
(a) Two (2) members of the Kentucky General Assembly, one (1) appointed by
the President of the Senate and one (1) appointed by the Speaker of the House
of Representatives, who shall be ex officio nonvoting members;
(b) The commissioner of the Department for Community Based Services, who
shall be an ex officio nonvoting member;
(c) The commissioner of the Department for Public Health, who shall be an ex
officio nonvoting member;
(d) A family court judge selected by the Chief Justice of the Kentucky Supreme
Court, who shall be an ex officio nonvoting member[members];
Page 9 of 56
XXXX 2/17/2026 11:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1747
(e) A pediatrician from the University of Kentucky's Department of Pediatrics
who is licensed and experienced in forensic medicine relating to child abuse
and neglect to be selected by the Attorney General from a list of three (3)
names provided by the dean of the University of Kentucky School of
Medicine;
(f) A pediatrician from the University of Louisville's Department of Pediatrics
who is licensed and experienced in forensic medicine relating to child abuse
and neglect to be selected by the Attorney General from a list of three (3)
names provided by the dean of the University of Louisville School of
Medicine;
(g) The state medical examiner or designee;
(h) A court-appointed special advocate (CASA) program director to be selected
by the Attorney General from a list of three (3) names provided by the
Kentucky CASA Association;
(i) A peace officer with experience investigating child abuse and neglect
fatalities and near fatalities to be selected by the Attorney General from a list
of three (3) names provided by the commissioner of the Kentucky State
Police;
(j) A representative from Prevent Child Abuse Kentucky, Inc. to be selected by
the Attorney General from a list of three (3) names provided by the president
of the Prevent Child Abuse Kentucky, Inc. board of directors;
(k) A practicing local prosecutor to be selected by the Attorney General;
(l) The executive director of the Kentucky Domestic Violence Association or the
executive director's designee;
(m) The chairperson of the State Child Fatality Review Team established in
accordance with KRS 211.684 or the chairperson's designee;
(n) A practicing social work clinician to be selected by the Attorney General from
Page 10 of 56
XXXX 2/17/2026 11:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1747
a list of three (3) names provided by the Board of Social Work;
(o) A practicing addiction counselor to be selected by the Attorney General from
a list of three (3) names provided by the Kentucky Association of Addiction
Professionals;
(p) A representative from the family resource and youth service centers to be
selected by the Attorney General from a list of three (3) names submitted by
the Cabinet for Health and Family Services;
(q) A representative of a community mental health center to be selected by the
Attorney General from a list of three (3) names provided by the Kentucky
Association of Regional Mental Health and Mental Retardation Programs,
Inc.;
(r) A member of a citizen foster care review board selected by the Chief Justice
of the Kentucky Supreme Court;
(s) An at-large representative who shall serve as chairperson to be selected by the
Secretary of State;
(t) The president of the Kentucky Coroners Association; and
(u) A practicing medication-assisted treatment provider to be selected by the
Attorney General from a list of three (3) names provided by the Kentucky
Board of Medical Licensure.
(3) (a) [By August 1, 2013, ]The appointing authority or the appointing authorities,
as the case may be, shall have appointed panel members. Initial terms of
members, other than those serving ex officio, shall be staggered to provide
continuity. Initial appointments shall be: five (5) members for terms of one (1)
year, five (5) members for terms of two (2) years, and five (5) members for
terms of three (3) years, these terms to expire, in each instance, on June 30
and thereafter until a successor is appointed and accepts appointment.
(b) Upon the expiration of these initial staggered terms, successors shall be
Page 11 of 56
XXXX 2/17/2026 11:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1747
appointed by the respective appointing authorities[,] for terms of two (2)
years[,] and until successors are appointed and accept their appointments.
Members shall be eligible for reappointment. Vacancies in the membership of
the panel shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments.
(c) At any time, a panel member shall recuse himself or herself from the review
of a case if the panel member believes he or she has a personal or private
conflict of interest.
(d) If a voting panel member is absent from two (2) or more consecutive,
regularly scheduled meetings, the member shall be considered to have
resigned and shall be replaced with a new member in the same manner as the
original appointment.
(e) If a voting panel member is proven to have violated subsection (13) of this
section, the member shall be removed from the panel, and the member shall
be replaced with a new member in the same manner as the original
appointment.
(4) The panel shall meet at least quarterly and may meet upon the call of the
chairperson of the panel.
(5) Members of the panel shall receive no compensation for their duties related to the
panel, but may be reimbursed for expenses incurred in accordance with state
guidelines and administrative regulations.
(6) Each panel member shall be provided copies of all information set out in this
subsection, including but not limited to records and information, upon request, to be
gathered, unredacted, and submitted to the panel within thirty (30) days by the
Cabinet for Health and Family Services from the Department for Community Based
Services or any agency, organization, or entity involved with a child subject to a
fatality or near fatality:
(a) Cabinet for Health and Family Services records and documentation regarding
Page 12 of 56
XXXX 2/17/2026 11:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1747
the deceased or injured child and his or her caregivers, residents of the home,
and persons supervising the child at the time of the incident that include all
records and documentation set out in this paragraph:
1. All prior and ongoing investigations, services, or contacts;
2. [Any and ]All records of services to the family provided by agencies or
individuals contracted by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services;
and
3. All documentation of actions taken as a result of child fatality internal
reviews conducted pursuant to KRS 620.050(12)(b);
(b) Licensing reports from the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, Office of
Inspector General, if an incident occurred in a licensed facility;
(c) All available records regarding protective services provided out of state;
(d) All records of services provided by the Department for Juvenile Justice
regarding the deceased or injured child and his or her caregivers, residents of
the home, and persons involved with the child at the time of the incident;
(e) Autopsy reports;
(f) Emergency medical service, fire department, law enforcement, coroner, and
other first responder reports, including but not limited to photos and
interviews with family members and witnesses;
(g) Medical records regarding the deceased or injured child, including but not
limited to all records and documentation set out in this paragraph:
1. Primary care records, including progress notes; developmental
milestones; growth charts that include head circumference; all
laboratory and X-ray requests and results; and birth record that includes
record of delivery type, complications, and initial physical exam of
baby;
2. In-home provider care notes about observations of the family, bonding,
Page 13 of 56
XXXX 2/17/2026 11:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1747
others in home, and concerns;
3. Hospitalization and emergency department records;
4. Dental records;
5. Specialist records; and
6. All photographs of injuries of the child that are available;
(h) Educational records of the deceased or injured child, or other children residing
in the home where the incident occurred, including but not limited to the
records and documents set out in this paragraph:
1. Attendance records;
2. Special education services;
3. School-based health records; and
4. Documentation of any interaction and services provided to the children
and family.
The release of educational records shall comply[be in compliance] with the
Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act, 20 U.S.C. sec. 1232g and its
implementing regulations;
(i) Head Start records or records from any other child care or early child care
provider;
(j) Records of any Family, Circuit, or District Court involvement with the
deceased or injured child and his or her caregivers, residents of the home and
persons involved with the child at the time of the incident that include but are
not limited to the juvenile and family court records and orders set out in this
paragraph, pursuant to KRS Chapters 199, 403, 405, 406, and 600 to 645:
1. Petitions;
2. Court reports by the Department for Community Based Services,
guardian ad litem, court-appointed special advocate, and the Citizen
Foster Care Review Board;
Page 14 of 56
XXXX 2/17/2026 11:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1747
3. All orders of the court, including temporary, dispositional, or
adjudicatory; and
4. Documentation of annual or any other review by the court;
(k) Home visit records from the Department for Public Health or other services;
(l) All information on prior allegations of abuse or neglect and deaths of children
of adults residing in the household;
(m) All law enforcement records and documentation regarding the deceased or
injured child and his or her caregivers, residents of the home, and persons
involved with the child at the time of the incident; and
(n) Mental health records regarding the deceased or injured child and his or her
caregivers, residents of the home, and persons involved with the child at the
time of the incident.
(7) The panel may seek the advice of experts, such as persons specializing in the fields
of psychiatric and forensic medicine, nursing, psychology, social work, education,
law enforcement, family law, or other related fields, if the facts of a case warrant
additional expertise.
(8) The panel shall post updates after each meeting to the website of the Justice and
Public Safety Cabinet regarding case reviews, findings, and recommendations.
(9) The panel chairperson, or other requested persons, shall report a summary of the
panel's discussions and proposed or actual recommendations to the Interim Joint
Committee on Families and Children of the Kentucky General Assembly monthly
or at the request of a committee co-chair. The goal of the committee shall be to
ensure impartiality regarding the operations of the panel during its review process.
(10) (a) The panel shall publish an annual report by February 1 of each year consisting
of case reviews, findings, and recommendations for system and process
improvements to help prevent child fatalities and near fatalities that are due to
abuse and neglect. The report shall be submitted to the Governor, the
Page 15 of 56
XXXX 2/17/2026 11:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1747
secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, the Chief Justice of
the Supreme Court, the Attorney General, the State Child Abuse and Neglect
Prevention Board established pursuant to KRS 15.905, and the director of the
Legislative Research Commission for distribution to the Interim Joint
Committee on Families and Children[,] and the Interim Joint Committee on
Judiciary.
(b) The panel shall determine which agency is responsible for implementing each
recommendation, and shall forward each recommendation in writing to the
appropriate agency.
(c) Any agency that receives a recommendation from the panel shall, within
ninety (90) days of receipt:
1. Respond to the panel with a written notice of intent to implement the
recommendation, an explanation of how the recommendation will be
implemented, and an approximate time frame of implementation; or
2. Respond to the panel with a written notice that the agency does not
intend to implement the recommendation, and a detailed explanation of
why the recommendation cannot be implemented.
(11) (a) Information and record copies that are confidential under state or federal law
and are provided to the external child fatality and near fatality review panel by
the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, the Department for Community
Based Services, or any agency, organization, or entity for review shall not
become the information and records of the panel and shall not lose their
confidentiality by virtue of the panel's access to the information and records.
(b) The original information and records used to generate information and record
copies provided to the panel in accordance with subsection (6) of this section
shall be maintained by the appropriate agency in accordance with state and
federal law and shall be subject to the Kentucky Open Records Act, KRS
Page 16 of 56
XXXX 2/17/2026 11:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1747
61.870 to 61.884.
(c) All open records requests shall be made to the appropriate agency, not to the
external child fatality and near fatality review panel or any of the panel
members. Information and record copies provided to the panel for review
shall be exempt from the Kentucky Open Records Act, KRS 61.870 to 61.884.
(d) At the conclusion of the panel's examination, all copies of information and
records provided to the panel involving an individual case shall be destroyed
by the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet.
(12) (a) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portions of the
external child fatality and near fatality review panel meetings during which an
individual child fatality or near fatality case is reviewed or discussed by panel
members may be a closed session and subject to the provisions of KRS
61.815(1) and shall only occur following the conclusion of an open session.
At the conclusion of the closed session, the panel shall immediately convene
an open session and give a summary of what occurred during the closed
session.
(b) The external child fatality and near fatality review panel may compel the
attendance of individuals from an investigating agency to discuss cases that
are being reviewed or discussed by the panel under paragraph (a) of this
subsection in closed session.
(13) Each member of the external child fatality and near fatality review panel, any
person attending a closed panel session, and any person presenting information or
records on an individual child fatality or near fatality shall not release information
or records not available under the Kentucky Open Records Act, KRS 61.870 to
61.884, to the public.
(14) A member of the external child fatality and near fatality review panel shall not be
prohibited from making a good faith report to any state or federal agency of any
Page 17 of 56
XXXX 2/17/2026 11:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1747
information or issue that the panel member believes should be reported or disclosed
[in an effort ]to facilitate effectiveness and transparency in Kentucky's child
protective services.
(15) A member of the external child fatality and near fatality review panel shall not be
held liable for any civil damages or criminal penalties pursuant to KRS 620.990 as
a result of any action taken or omitted in the performance of the member's duties
pursuant to this section and KRS 620.050, except for violations of subsection (11),
(12), or (13) of this section.
(16) The proceedings, records, opinions, and deliberations of the external child fatality
and near fatality review panel shall be privileged and shall not be subject to
discovery, subpoena, or introduction into evidence in any civil or criminal actions
in any manner that would directly or indirectly identify specific persons or cases
reviewed by the panel. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to restrict or
limit the right to discover or use in any civil action any evidence that is
discoverable independent of the proceedings of the panel.
(17) The Legislative Oversight and Investigations Committee of the Kentucky General
Assembly shall conduct an annual evaluation of the external child fatality and near
fatality review panel established pursuant to this section to monitor the operations,
procedures, and recommendations of the panel and shall report its findings to the
General Assembly.
Section 7. KRS 15.334 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Kentucky Law Enforcement Council shall approve mandatory training subjects
to be taught to all students attending a law enforcement basic training course that
include but are not limited to:
(a) Abuse, neglect, and exploitation of the elderly and other crimes against the
elderly, including the use of multidisciplinary teams in the investigation and
prosecution of crimes against the elderly;
Page 18 of 56
XXXX 2/17/2026 11:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1747
(b) The dynamics of domestic violence, pediatric abusive head trauma, as defined
in KRS 620.020, child physical and sexual abuse, and rape; child
development; the effects of abuse and crime on adult and child victims,
including the impact of abuse and violence on child development; legal
remedies for protection; lethality and risk issues; profiles of offenders and
offender treatment; model protocols for addressing domestic violence, rape,
pediatric abusive head trauma, as defined in KRS 620.020, and child abuse;
available community resources and victim services; and reporting
requirements. This training shall be developed in consultation with legal,
victim services, victim advocacy, and mental health professionals with
expertise in domestic violence, child abuse, and rape. Training in recognizing
pediatric abusive head trauma may be designed in collaboration with
organizations and agencies that specialize in the prevention and recognition of
pediatric abusive head trauma approved by the secretary of the Cabinet for
Health and Family Services;
(c) Human immunodeficiency virus infection and acquired immunodeficiency
virus syndrome;
(d) Identification and investigation of, responding to, and reporting bias-related
crime, victimization, or intimidation that is a result of or reasonably related to
race, color, religion, sex, or national origin;
(e) The characteristics and dynamics of human trafficking, state and federal laws
relating to human trafficking, the investigation of cases involving human
trafficking, including but not limited to screening for human trafficking, and
resources for assistance to the victims of human trafficking;
(f) [Beginning January 1, 2017, the council shall require that a law enforcement
basic training course include ]At least eight (8) hours of training relevant to
sexual assault;[ and]
Page 19 of 56
XXXX 2/17/2026 11:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1747
(g) Education on female genital mutilation as defined in KRS 508.125, including
the risk factors associated with female genital mutilation, the criminal
penalties for committing female genital mutilation, and the psychological and
health effects on a victim of female genital mutilation; and
(h) The characteristics, dynamics, and investigation of pediatric ingestion or
inhalation of controlled substances.
(2) (a) The council shall develop and approve mandatory in-service training courses
to be presented to all certified peace officers. The council may promulgate
administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A setting forth
the deadlines by which all certified peace officers shall attend the mandatory
in-service training courses.
(b) [Beginning January 1, 2017, ]The council shall establish a forty (40) hour
sexual assault investigation training course. [After January 1, 2019, ]Agencies
shall maintain officers on staff who have completed the forty (40) hour sexual
assault investigation training course in accordance with the following:
1. Agencies with more than ten (10) but fewer than twenty-one (21) full-
time officers shall maintain one (1) officer who has completed the forty
(40) hour sexual assault investigation training course;
2. Agencies with twenty-one (21) or more but fewer than fifty-one (51)
full-time officers shall maintain at least two (2) officers who have
completed the forty (40) hour sexual assault investigation training
course; and
3. Agencies with fifty-one (51) or more full-time officers shall maintain at
least four (4) officers who have completed the sexual assault
investigation course.
(c) An agency shall not make an officer directly responsible for the investigation
or processing of sexual assault offenses unless that officer has completed the
Page 20 of 56
XXXX 2/17/2026 11:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1747
forty (40) hour sexual assault investigation training course.
(d) The council may, upon application by any agency, grant an exemption from
the training requirements set forth in paragraph (b) of this subsection if that
agency, by limitations arising from its scope of authority, does not conduct
sexual assault investigations.
(e) Any agency failing to comply with paragraph (b) or (c) of this subsection
shall, from the date the noncompliance commences, have one (1) year to
reestablish the minimum number of trained officers required.
(3) (a) The Justice and Public Safety Cabinet shall provide training on the subjects
of:
1. Domestic violence and abuse[ and may do so utilizing currently
available technology]. All certified peace officers shall be required to
complete this training at least once every two (2) years; and
2. Pediatric ingestion or inhalation of controlled substances. All certified
peace officers shall be required to complete this training at least once
every three (3) years.
(b) Training required under paragraph (a) of this subsection may be completed
utilizing currently available technology.
(4) The council shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A to establish mandatory basic training and in-service training courses.
Section 8. KRS 194A.545 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The secretary for health and family services shall develop an initial training course
and continuing education courses for employees of the Department for Community
Based Services concerning the:
(a) Dynamics of domestic violence and elder abuse, neglect, and exploitation;
effects of domestic violence and elder abuse, neglect, and exploitation on
adult and child victims;
Page 21 of 56
XXXX 2/17/2026 11:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1747
(b) Legal remedies for protection;
(c) Lethality and risk issues;
(d) Model protocols for addressing domestic violence; and
(e) Available community resources and victim services; and reporting
requirements.
The training shall be developed in consultation with legal, victim services, victim
advocacy, and mental health professionals with an expertise in domestic violence.
(2) Each person employed by the Department for Community Based Services who
provides supervisory or direct service at the local, district, or state level shall
successfully complete the initial training course and, at least once every two (2)
years, the continuing education course developed under subsection (1) of this
section.
(3) The secretary is encouraged to include an educational component covering the
recognition and prevention of:
(a) Pediatric abusive head trauma, as defined in KRS 620.020; and[,]
(b) Pediatric ingestion or inhalation of controlled substances;
as part of the initial training and continuing education for Department for
Community Based Services front-line child protection staff.
Section 9. KRS 199.896 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A[No] person, association, or organization shall not conduct, operate, maintain, or
advertise any child-care center without obtaining a license as provided in KRS
199.892 to 199.896.
(2) The cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter
13A relating to license fees and may, in the administrative regulations, establish
standards of care and service for a child-care center, criteria for the denial of a
license if criminal records indicate convictions that may impact the safety and
security of children in care, and procedures for enforcement of penalties which are
Page 22 of 56
XXXX 2/17/2026 11:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1747
not in contravention of this section.
(3) Each initial application for a license shall be made to the cabinet and shall be
accompanied by a fee that shall not exceed administrative costs of the program to
the cabinet and shall be renewable annually upon expiration and reapplication when
accompanied by a renewal fee that shall not exceed administrative costs of the
program to the cabinet. Regular licenses and renewals thereof shall expire one (1)
year from their effective date.
(4) A[No] child-care center shall not be refused a license or have its license revoked for
failure to meet standards set by the secretary until after the expiration of a period
not to exceed six (6) months from the date of the first official notice that the
standards have not been met. If[, however,] the cabinet has probable cause to
believe that an immediate threat to the public health, safety, or welfare exists, the
cabinet may take emergency action pursuant to KRS 13B.125. All administrative
hearings conducted under authority of KRS 199.892 to 199.896 shall be conducted
in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.
(5) If, upon inspection or investigation, the inspector general finds that a child-care
center licensed under this section has violated the administrative regulations,
standards, or requirements of the cabinet, the inspector general shall issue a
statement of deficiency to the center containing:
(a) A statement of fact;
(b) A statement of how an administrative regulation, standard, or requirement of
the cabinet was violated; and
(c) The timeframe, negotiated with the child-care center, within which a violation
is to be corrected, except that a violation that poses an immediate threat to the
health, safety, or welfare of children in the center shall be corrected in no
event later than five (5) working days from the date of the statement of
deficiency.
Page 23 of 56
XXXX 2/17/2026 11:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1747
(6) The Cabinet for Health and Family Services, in consultation with the Office of the
Inspector General, shall establish by administrative regulations promulgated in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13A an informal dispute resolution process through
which a child-care provider may dispute licensure deficiencies that have an adverse
effect on the child-care provider's license.
(7) A child-care center shall have the right to appeal to the Cabinet for Health and
Family Services under KRS Chapter 13B any action adverse to its license or the
assessment of a civil penalty issued by the inspector general as the result of a
violation contained in a statement of deficiency within twenty (20) days of the
issuance of the action or assessment of the civil penalty. An appeal shall not act to
stay the correction of a violation.
(8) In assessing the civil penalty to be levied against a child-care center for a violation
contained in a statement of deficiency issued under this section, the inspector
general or the inspector general's designee shall take into consideration the
following factors:
(a) The gravity of the threat to the health, safety, or welfare of children posed by
the violation;
(b) The number and type of previous violations of the child-care center;
(c) The reasonable diligence exercised by the child-care center and efforts to
correct the violation; and
(d) The amount of assessment necessary to assure immediate and continued
compliance.
(9) Upon a child-care center's failure to take action to correct a violation of the
administrative regulations, standards, or requirements of the cabinet contained in a
statement of deficiency, or at any time when the operation of a child-care center
poses an immediate threat to the health, safety, or welfare of children in the center,
and the child-care center continues to operate after the cabinet has taken emergency
Page 24 of 56
XXXX 2/17/2026 11:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1747
action to deny, suspend, or revoke its license, the cabinet or the cabinet's designee
shall take at least one (1) of the following actions against the center:
(a) Institute proceedings to obtain an order compelling compliance with the
administrative regulations, standards, and requirements of the cabinet;
(b) Institute injunctive proceedings in Circuit Court to terminate the operation of
the center;
(c) Institute action to discontinue payment of child-care subsidies; or
(d) Suspend or revoke the license or impose other penalties provided by law.
(10) Upon request of any person, the cabinet shall provide information regarding the
denial, revocation, suspension, or violation of any type of child-care center license
of the operator. Identifying information regarding children and their families shall
remain confidential.
(11) The cabinet shall provide, upon request, public information regarding the
inspections of and the plans of correction for the child-care center within the past
year. All information distributed by the cabinet under this subsection shall include a
statement indicating that the reports as provided under this subsection from the past
five (5) years are available from the child-care center upon the parent's, custodian's,
guardian's, or other interested person's request.
(12) All fees collected under the provisions of KRS 199.892 to 199.896 for license and
certification applications shall be paid into the State Treasury and credited to a
special fund for the purpose of administering KRS 199.892 to 199.896 including the
payment of expenses of and to the participants in child-care workshops. The funds
collected are hereby appropriated for the use of the cabinet. The balance of the
special fund shall lapse to the general fund at the end of each biennium.
(13) Any advertisement for child-care services shall include the address of where the
service is being provided.
(14) All inspections of licensed and unlicensed child-care centers by the Cabinet for
Page 25 of 56
XXXX 2/17/2026 11:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1747
Health and Family Services shall be unannounced.
(15) All employees and owners of a child-care center who provide care to children shall
demonstrate within the first three (3) months of employment completion of at least
a total of six (6) hours of orientation in the following areas:
(a) Basic health, safety, and sanitation;
(b) Recognizing and reporting child abuse; and
(c) Developmentally appropriate child-care practice.
(16) All employees and owners of a child-care center who provide care to children shall
annually demonstrate to the department completion of at least six (6) hours of
training in child development. These hours shall include but are not limited to:
(a) One and one-half (1.5) hours one (1) time every five (5) years of continuing
education in the recognition and prevention of pediatric abusive head trauma,
as defined in KRS 620.020. Training in recognizing pediatric abusive head
trauma may be designed in collaboration with organizations and agencies that
specialize in the prevention and recognition of pediatric head trauma approved
by the secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services; and
(b) One (1) hour one (1) time every three (3) years of continuing education in
the recognition and prevention of pediatric ingestion or inhalation of
controlled substances.
The continuing education[one and one-half (1.5) hours] required under this
subsection[section] shall be included in the current number of required continuing
education hours.
(17) The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall make available either through the
development or approval of a model training curriculum and training materials,
including video instructional materials, to cover the areas specified in subsection
(15) of this section. The cabinet shall develop or approve the model training
curriculum and training materials to cover the areas specified in subsection (15) of
Page 26 of 56
XXXX 2/17/2026 11:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1747
this section.
(18) Child-care centers licensed pursuant to this section and family child-care homes
certified pursuant to KRS 199.8982 shall not use corporal physical discipline,
including the use of spanking, shaking, or paddling, as a means of punishment,
discipline, behavior modification, or for any other reason. For the purposes of this
section, "corporal physical discipline" means the deliberate infliction of physical
pain and does not include spontaneous physical contact that is intended to protect a
child from immediate danger.
(19) Child-care centers that provide instructional and educational programs for
preschool-aged children that operate for a maximum of twenty (20) hours per week
and that a child attends for no more than fifteen (15) hours per week shall:
(a) Notify the cabinet in writing that the center is operating;
(b) Meet all child-care center licensure requirements and administrative
regulations related to employee background checks;
(c) Meet all child-care center licensure requirements and administrative
regulations related to tuberculosis screenings; and
(d) Be exempt from all other child-care center licensure requirements and
administrative regulations.
(20) Child-care centers that provide instructional and educational programs for
preschool-aged children that operate for a maximum of twenty (20) hours per week
and that a child attends for no more than ten (10) hours per week shall be exempt
from all child-care licensure requirements and administrative regulations.
(21) Instructional programs for school-age children that offer, whether free or for a fee,
recreational, educational, sports training, or vacation programs that include but are
not limited to martial arts and dance programs to children under eighteen (18) years
of age, that a child attends outside the presence of his or her parent or legal
guardian, shall be exempt from all child-care licensure administrative regulations if
Page 27 of 56
XXXX 2/17/2026 11:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1747
the following criteria are met:
(a) The program provides primary instruction in a skill, talent, ability, expertise,
or proficiency;
(b) The program operates outside the time period when school is in session,
including before or after school hours, holidays, school breaks, teaching
planning days, or summer vacation;
(c) The program does not advertise or otherwise represent that the program is a
licensed child-care center or that the program offers child-care services;
(d) The program informs the parent or guardian:
1. That the program is not licensed by the cabinet; and
2. About the physical risks a child may face while participating in the
program; and
(e) The program conducts the following background checks for all program
employees and volunteers who work with children:
1. Check of the child abuse and neglect records maintained by the cabinet;
and
2. In-state criminal background information check from the Justice and
Public Safety Cabinet or Administrative Office of the Courts.
(22) Directors and employees of child-care centers in a position that involves
supervisory or disciplinary power over a minor, or direct contact with a minor, shall
submit to a criminal record check in accordance with KRS 199.8965.
(23) A director or employee of a child-care center may be employed on a probationary
status pending receipt of the criminal background check. Application for the
criminal record of a probationary employee shall be made no later than the date
probationary employment begins.
(24) The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations to identify emergency care
providers who provide essential child-care services during an identified state of
Page 28 of 56
XXXX 2/17/2026 11:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1747
emergency.
(25) Notwithstanding any state law, administrative regulation, executive order, or
executive directive to the contrary, during the 2020 or 2021 state of emergency
declared by the Governor in response to COVID-19, including but not limited to
any mutated strain of the COVID-19 virus, the cabinet shall not establish any
restrictions on capacity for class or group size or the ability to combine classes and
groups for capacity limits in the morning or afternoon that is below the number that
was in effect on February 1, 2020.
Section 10. KRS 199.8982 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The cabinet shall establish a family child-care home certification program
which shall be administered by the department. A family child-care provider
shall apply for certification of the provider's home if the provider is caring for
four (4) to six (6) children unrelated to the provider. A family child-care
provider caring for three (3) or fewer children may apply for certification of
the provider's home at the discretion of the provider. Applicants for
certification shall not have been found by the cabinet or a court to have
abused or neglected a child, and shall meet the following minimum
requirements:
1. Submit two (2) written character references;
2. Provide a written statement from a physician or advanced practice
registered nurse that the applicant is in good health;
3. Submit to a criminal record check in accordance with KRS 199.8965;
4. Provide smoke detectors, a telephone, an adequate water supply,
sufficient lighting and space, and a safe environment in the residence in
which care is provided;
5. Provide a copy of the results of a tuberculosis risk assessment and the
results of any appropriate follow-up with skin testing or chest X-ray for
Page 29 of 56
XXXX 2/17/2026 11:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1747
applicants who are determined to be at risk for developing tuberculosis
in accordance with the recommendations of the Centers for Disease
Control and Prevention within thirty (30) days of the date of application
for certification; and
6. Demonstrate completion of a total of at least six (6) hours of training in
the following areas within three (3) months of application for
certification:
a. Basic health, safety, and sanitation;
b. Recognizing and reporting child abuse; and
c. Developmentally appropriate child-care practice.
(b) Initial applications for certification shall be made to the department. The
cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations to establish fees that shall
not exceed costs of the program to the cabinet, for proper administration of
the certification. The department shall issue a certificate of operation upon
inspecting the family child-care home and determining the provider's
compliance with the provisions of this section. The inspection shall be
unannounced. A certificate of operation issued pursuant to this section shall
not be transferable and shall be renewed every two (2) years for a fee that
shall not exceed costs of the program to the cabinet for renewal.
(c) A certified family child-care provider shall display the certificate of operation
in a prominent place within the residence in which care is provided. The
cabinet shall provide the certified family child-care provider with written
information explaining the requirements for a family day-care provider and
instructions on the method of reporting violations of the requirements which
the provider shall distribute to parents.
(d) Upon request of any person, the cabinet shall provide information regarding
the denial, revocation, suspension, or violation of any type of day-care license
Page 30 of 56
XXXX 2/17/2026 11:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1747
of the family child-care provider. Identifying information regarding children
and their families shall remain confidential.
(e) The cabinet shall provide, upon request, public information regarding the
inspections of and the plans of correction for the family child-care home
within the past year. All information distributed by the cabinet under this
paragraph shall include a statement indicating that the reports as provided
under this paragraph from the past five (5) years are available from the family
child-care home upon the parent's, custodian's, guardian's, or other interested
person's request.
(f) The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with
KRS Chapter 13A which establish standards for the issuance, monitoring,
release of information under this section and KRS 199.896 and 199.898,
renewal, denial, revocation, and suspension of a certificate of operation for a
family child-care home and establish criteria for the denial of certification if
criminal records indicate convictions that may impact the safety and security
of children in care. A denial, suspension, or revocation of a certificate may be
appealed, and upon appeal an administrative hearing shall be conducted in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13B. If the cabinet has probable cause to
believe that there is an immediate threat to the public health, safety, or
welfare, the cabinet may take emergency action to suspend a certificate
pursuant to KRS 13B.125. The cabinet shall promulgate administrative
regulations to impose minimum staff-to-child ratios. The cabinet may
promulgate administrative regulations relating to other requirements
necessary to ensure minimum safety in family child-care homes. The cabinet
shall develop and provide an ["]easy-to-read["] guide containing the following
information to a family child-care provider seeking certification of his or her
home:
Page 31 of 56
XXXX 2/17/2026 11:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1747
1. Certification requirements and procedures;
2. Information about available child-care training; and
3. Child-care food sponsoring organizations.
(2) Family child-care providers shall annually demonstrate to the department
completion of at least six (6) hours of training in child development. These hours
shall include but are not limited to:
(a) One and one-half (1.5) hours one (1) time every five (5) years of continuing
education in the recognition and prevention of pediatric abusive head trauma,
as defined in KRS 620.020. Training in recognizing pediatric abusive head
trauma may be designed in collaboration with organizations and agencies that
specialize in the prevention and recognition of pediatric abusive head trauma
approved by the secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services; and
(b) One (1) hour one (1) time every three (3) years of continuing education in
the recognition and prevention of pediatric ingestion or inhalation of
controlled substances.
The [one and one-half (1.5) hours of ]continuing education required under this
subsection[section] shall be included in the current number of required continuing
education hours.
(3) The cabinet shall, either through the development of or approval of, make available
a model training curriculum and training materials, including video instructional
materials, to cover the areas specified in subsection (1)(a)6. of this section. The
cabinet shall develop or approve the model training curriculum and training
materials to cover the areas specified in subsection (1)(a)6. of this section.
(4) (a) As used in this subsection "local government" means a city, county, charter
county, urban-county government, consolidated local government, or unified
local government.
(b) The provisions of this section shall supersede all local government ordinances
Page 32 of 56
XXXX 2/17/2026 11:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1747
or regulations pertaining to the certification, licensure, and training
requirements related to the operation of family child-care homes and a[no]
local government shall not adopt or enforce any additional licensure,
certification, or training requirements specifically applicable to family child-
care homes in addition to those provided in this section. This subsection shall
not be interpreted or construed to exempt family child-care homes from
compliance with local government ordinances and regulations that apply
generally within the jurisdiction.
(c) Because the availability of adequate child-care as an essential business is vital
to the Commonwealth's state and local economies,[ by January 1, 2022,] a
local government that has adopted land use regulations pursuant to KRS
Chapter 100 shall specifically name family child-care homes in the text of its
zoning regulations to authorize the board of adjustments to separately
consider the applications of proposed family child-care homes for conditional
use permits within the residential zones of the planning unit where they are
not a fully permitted use pursuant to KRS 100.237.
Section 11. KRS 216B.405 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "urgent treatment facility" or "urgent care facility" means a
facility that delivers medically necessary ambulatory medical care apart from a
hospital emergency department setting usually on a walk-in basis.
(2) All urgent treatment or urgent care facilities shall make available at least:
(a) One (1) time every two (2) years a continuing education course relating to the
recognition and prevention of pediatric abusive head trauma, as defined in
KRS 620.020. Training in recognizing pediatric abusive head trauma may be
designed in collaboration with organizations and agencies that specialize in
the prevention and recognition of pediatric abusive head trauma approved by
the secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services; and
Page 33 of 56
XXXX 2/17/2026 11:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1747
(b) One (1) hour one (1) time every three (3) years of continuing education in
the recognition and prevention of pediatric ingestion or inhalation of
controlled substances.
Section 12. KRS 311.601 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The board may adopt reasonable rules and regulations to effectuate and implement
the provisions of KRS 311.550 to 311.620, including but not limited to regulations
designed to ensure the continuing professional competency of present and future
licensees. As an adjunct to the power conferred upon the board by this section, the
board may require licensees to submit to interrogation as to the nature and extent of
their postgraduate medical education and to require licensees found to be deficient
in their efforts to keep abreast of new methods and technology[,] to obtain
additional instruction and training[ therein].
(2) As part of the continuing medical education which the board adopts to ensure
continuing professional competency of present and future licensees, the board shall
ensure that:
(a) Current practicing pediatricians, including those certified in medicine and
pediatrics, radiologists, family practitioners, and those physicians practicing
in an emergency medicine or urgent care setting, demonstrate completion of:
1. A one (1) time course of at least one (1) hour of continuing medical
education approved by the board and covering the recognition and
prevention of:
a. Pediatric abusive head trauma, as defined in KRS 620.020; and[,
prior to December 31, 2017]
b. Pediatric ingestion or inhalation of controlled substances.
The continuing education required under this subparagraph shall be
included in the current number of required continuing education
hours; and
Page 34 of 56
XXXX 2/17/2026 11:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1747
2. At least one (1) hour of the required four and one-half (4.5) hours of
approved continuing education relating to the use of the Kentucky All
Schedule Prescription Electronic Reporting system, pain management,
and addiction disorders shall include educating clients on safe
storage, recognizing signs and symptoms of occult pediatric
ingestions, and proper toxicology screening for commonly ingested
controlled substances in pediatric patients; and
(b) Future practicing pediatricians, including those certified in medicine and
pediatrics, radiologists, family practitioners, and those physicians who will
practice in an emergency medicine or urgent care setting, demonstrate
completion of a:
1. One (1) time course of at least one (1) hour of continuing medical
education, or its equivalent, approved by the board and covering the
recognition and prevention of:
a. Pediatric abusive head trauma, as defined in KRS 620.020; and[,]
b. Pediatric ingestion or inhalation of controlled substances;
within five (5) years of licensure.
2. Future practicing pediatricians, including those certified in medicine and
pediatrics, radiologists, family practitioners, and those physicians who
will practice in an emergency medicine or urgent care setting may apply
pediatric abusive head trauma or pediatric ingestion or inhalation of
controlled substances curriculum taught in their medical school
education to count towards the required one (1) hour of continuing
medical education.
Section 13. KRS 311.844 is amended to read as follows:
(1) To be licensed by the board as a physician assistant, an applicant shall:
(a) Submit a completed application form with the required fee;
Page 35 of 56
XXXX 2/17/2026 11:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1747
(b) Be of good character and reputation;
(c) Be a graduate of an approved program; and
(d) Have passed an examination approved by the board within three (3) attempts.
(2) A physician assistant who is authorized to practice in another state and who is in
good standing may apply for licensure by endorsement from the state of his or her
credentialing if that state has standards substantially equivalent to those of this
Commonwealth.
(3) A physician assistant's license shall be valid for two (2) years and shall be renewed
by the board upon fulfillment of the following requirements:
(a) The holder shall be of good character and reputation;
(b) The holder shall provide evidence of completion, during the previous two (2)
years, of a minimum of one hundred (100) hours of continuing education
approved by the American Medical Association, the American Osteopathic
Association, the American Academy of Family Physicians, the American
Academy of Physician Assistants, or by another entity approved by the board.
The one hundred (100) hours of continuing education required by this
paragraph shall include:
1. During the first two (2) years of licensure or prior to the first licensure
renewal:
a. One and one-half (1.5) hours of continuing education in the
prevention and recognition of pediatric abusive head trauma, as
defined in KRS 620.020, except that graduating physician assistant
students may apply pediatric abusive head trauma curriculum
taught in their physician assistant graduate education to count
towards the required one and one-half (1.5) hours; and
b. As a part of the continuing education requirements that the board
adopts to ensure continuing competency of present and future
Page 36 of 56
XXXX 2/17/2026 11:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1747
licensees and the evolving needs of the growing senior population,
the board shall ensure physician assistants licensed under KRS
Chapter 311 complete a one (1) time course of one (1) hour of
continuing education approved by the board. The course shall be
completed one (1) time and count towards the current number of
required continuing education hours, except that graduating
student physician assistants may submit Alzheimer's and other
forms of dementia course curriculum taught in their programs of
study towards the required one (1) hour for approval. The course
topics shall include but not be limited to:
i. The warning signs and symptoms of Alzheimer's disease and
other forms of dementia;
ii. The importance of early detection, diagnosis, and appropriate
communication techniques for discussion of memory
concerns with the patient and his or her caregiver;
iii. Cognitive assessment and care planning billing codes;
iv. The variety of tools used to assess a patient's cognition; and
v. Current treatments that may be available to the patient;[ and]
2. If the license holder is authorized, pursuant to KRS 311.858(5), to
prescribe and administer Schedule III, IV, or V controlled substances, a
minimum of seven and one-half (7.5) hours of approved continuing
education relating to controlled substance diversion, pain management,
addiction disorders, use of the electronic system for monitoring
controlled substances established in KRS 218A.202, or any combination
of two (2) or more of these subjects; and
3. At least one (1) hour one (1) time every three (3) years in the
recognition and prevention of pediatric ingestion or inhalation of
Page 37 of 56
XXXX 2/17/2026 11:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1747
controlled substances; and
(c) The holder shall provide proof of current certification with the National
Commission on Certification of Physician Assistants.
Section 14. KRS 311A.120 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As a condition of being issued a certificate or license as an emergency medical
technician, advanced emergency medical technician, emergency medical responder,
or paramedic, the applicant shall have completed a Kentucky Board of Emergency
Medical Services-approved educational course on the transmission, control,
treatment, and prevention of the human immunodeficiency virus and acquired
immunodeficiency syndrome with an emphasis on appropriate behavior and attitude
change.
(2) The board shall promulgate administrative regulations to require continuing
education for emergency medical technicians, advanced emergency medical
technicians, emergency medical responders, or paramedics that includes the
completion of:
(a) One (1) hour of board-approved continuing education covering the
recognition and prevention of pediatric abusive head trauma, as defined in
KRS 620.020, at least one (1) time every two (2) year renewal cycle; and
(b) One (1) hour one (1) time every three (3) years of board-approved
continuing education covering the recognition and prevention of pediatric
ingestion or inhalation of controlled substances.
The continuing education[one (1) hour] required under this subsection[section]
shall be included in the current number of required continuing education hours.
(3) The board shall promulgate administrative regulations to require continuing
education for emergency medical technicians or first responders which includes the
completion of a training course of at least one (1) hour covering awareness of
sexual violence, including reporting options, care options, pre-hospital treatment
Page 38 of 56
XXXX 2/17/2026 11:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1747
considerations, knowledge of regional rape crisis centers, and how to access the
SANE-ready list, at least one (1) time every two (2) year renewal cycle. The one (1)
hour of continuing education required under this subsection shall be included in the
current number of required continuing education hours.
Section 15. KRS 314.073 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As a prerequisite for license renewal, all individuals licensed under provisions of
this chapter shall be required to document continuing competency during the
immediate past licensure period as prescribed in regulations promulgated by the
board.
(2) The continuing competency requirement shall be documented and reported as set
forth by the board in administrative regulations promulgated in accordance with
KRS Chapter 13A.
(3) The board shall approve providers of continuing education. The approval may
include recognition of providers approved by national organizations and state
boards of nursing with comparable standards. Standards for these approvals shall be
set by the board in administrative regulations promulgated in accordance with the
provisions of KRS Chapter 13A.
(4) The board shall work cooperatively with professional nursing organizations,
approved nursing schools, and other potential sources of continuing education
programs to ensure that adequate continuing education offerings are available
statewide. The board may enter into contractual agreements to implement the
provisions of this section.
(5) The board shall be responsible for notifying applicants for licensure and licensees
applying for license renewal, of continuing competency requirements.
(6) As a part of the continuing education requirements that the board adopts to ensure
continuing competency of present and future licensees, the board shall ensure
practitioners licensed under KRS Chapter 314 complete:
Page 39 of 56
XXXX 2/17/2026 11:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1747
(a) A one-time training course of at least one and one-half (1.5) hours covering
the recognition and prevention of pediatric abusive head trauma, as defined in
KRS 620.020; and
(b) One (1) hour one (1) time every three (3) years covering the recognition and
prevention of pediatric ingestion or inhalation of controlled substances.
The continuing education[one and one-half (1.5) hours] required under this
subsection[section] shall be included in the current number of required continuing
education hours.
(7) As a part of the continuing education requirements that the board adopts to ensure
continuing competency of present and future licensees and the evolving needs of
the growing senior population, the board shall ensure practitioners licensed under
KRS Chapter 314 complete a one (1) time course of one (1) hour of continuing
education approved by the board. The course shall be completed one (1) time and
count towards the current number of required continuing education hours, except
that graduating student practitioners may submit Alzheimer's and other forms of
dementia course curriculum taught in their programs of study towards the required
one (1) hour for approval. The course topics shall include but not be limited to:
(a) The warning signs and symptoms of Alzheimer's disease and other forms of
dementia;
(b) The importance of early detection, diagnosis, and appropriate communication
techniques for discussion of memory concerns with the patient and his or her
caregiver;
(c) Cognitive assessment and care planning billing codes;
(d) The variety of tools used to assess a patient's cognition; and
(e) Current treatments that may be available to the patient.
(8) In order to offset administrative costs incurred in the implementation of the
mandatory continuing competency requirements, the board may charge reasonable
Page 40 of 56
XXXX 2/17/2026 11:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1747
fees as established by regulation in accordance with the provisions of KRS Chapter
13A.
(9) The continuing competency requirements shall include at least five (5) contact
hours in pharmacology continuing education for any person licensed as an
advanced practice registered nurse.
Section 16. KRS 335.130 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Each certified social worker, licensed social worker and licensed clinical social
worker shall renew his or her license every three (3) years, and shall pay the board
a renewal fee as established by the board by promulgation of an administrative
regulation.
(2) Licensees whose licenses are renewed by the board shall be issued a renewal
license.
(3) Renewal fees shall be waived for any licensee actually serving in the Armed Forces
of the United States. The waiver shall be effective for six (6) months following
honorable discharge, separation, or release from the Armed Forces, after which
period a license shall be considered lapsed.
(4) The board may, at its discretion, require continuing education as a condition of
license renewal.
(5) If the board requires continuing education as authorized in subsection (4), the
continuing education requirements for each licensed social worker and each
licensed clinical social worker shall include:
(a) One and one-half (1.5) hours of continuing education approved by the board
and covering the recognition and prevention of pediatric abusive head trauma,
as defined in KRS 620.020, at least one (1) time every six (6) years; and
(b) One (1) hour one (1) time every three (3) years of continuing education
approved by the board and covering the recognition and prevention of
pediatric ingestion or inhalation of controlled substances.
Page 41 of 56
XXXX 2/17/2026 11:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1747
The [one and one-half (1.5) hours of ]continuing education required under this
subsection[section] shall be included in the current number of required continuing
education hours.
Section 17. KRS 620.050 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Anyone acting upon reasonable cause in the making of a report or acting under
KRS 620.030 to 620.050 in good faith shall have immunity from any liability, civil
or criminal, that might otherwise be incurred or imposed. Any such participant shall
have the same immunity with respect to participation in any judicial proceeding
resulting from such report or action. However, any person who knowingly makes a
false report and does so with malice shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.
(2) Any employee or designated agent of a children's advocacy center shall be immune
from any civil liability arising from performance within the scope of the person's
duties as provided in KRS 620.030 to 620.050. Any such person shall have the
same immunity with respect to participation in any judicial proceeding. Nothing in
this subsection shall limit liability for negligence. Upon the request of an employee
or designated agent of a children's advocacy center, the Attorney General shall
provide for the defense of any civil action brought against the employee or
designated agent as provided under KRS 12.211 to 12.215.
(3) Neither the husband-wife nor any professional-client/patient privilege, except the
attorney-client and clergy-penitent privilege, shall be a ground for refusing to report
under this section or for excluding evidence regarding a dependent, neglected, or
abused child or the cause thereof, in any judicial proceedings resulting from a report
pursuant to this section. This subsection shall also apply in any criminal proceeding
in District or Circuit Court regarding a dependent, neglected, or abused child.
(4) Upon receipt of a report of an abused, neglected, or dependent child pursuant to this
chapter, the cabinet as the designated agency or its delegated representative shall
initiate a prompt investigation or assessment of family needs, take necessary action,
Page 42 of 56
XXXX 2/17/2026 11:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1747
and shall offer protective services toward safeguarding the welfare of the child. The
cabinet shall work toward preventing further dependency, neglect, or abuse of the
child or any other child under the same care, and preserve and strengthen family
life, where possible, by enhancing parental capacity for adequate child care. If an
oral or written report, including but not limited to electronic submissions, alleging
that a child is dependent, neglected, or abused is made pursuant to this section, and
the cabinet determines that the report does not meet criteria for an investigation, the
cabinet shall refer the family to appropriate community-based child and family
service agencies for services to preserve and strengthen family life in accordance
with the requirements in 42 U.S.C. sec. 5106a.
(5) The report of suspected child abuse, neglect, or dependency and all information
obtained by the cabinet or its delegated representative, as a result of an investigation
or assessment made pursuant to this chapter, except for those records provided for
in subsection (6) of this section, shall not be divulged to anyone except:
(a) Persons suspected of causing dependency, neglect, or abuse;
(b) The custodial parent or legal guardian of the child alleged to be dependent,
neglected, or abused;
(c) Persons within the cabinet with a legitimate interest or responsibility related
to the case;
(d) A licensed child-caring facility or child-placing agency evaluating placement
for or serving a child who is believed to be the victim of an abuse, neglect, or
dependency report;
(e) Other medical, psychological, educational, or social service agencies, child
care administrators, corrections personnel, or law enforcement agencies,
including the county attorney's office, the coroner, and the local child fatality
response team, that have a legitimate interest in the case;
(f) A noncustodial parent when the dependency, neglect, or abuse is
Page 43 of 56
XXXX 2/17/2026 11:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1747
substantiated;
(g) Members of multidisciplinary teams as defined by KRS 620.020 and which
operate pursuant to KRS 431.600;
(h) Employees or designated agents of a children's advocacy center;
(i) Those persons so authorized by court order;
(j) The external child fatality and near fatality review panel established by KRS
620.055; or
(k) The Commonwealth Office of the Ombudsman established pursuant to KRS
43.035.
(6) (a) Files, reports, notes, photographs, records, electronic and other
communications, and working papers used or developed by a children's
advocacy center in providing services under this chapter are confidential and
shall not be disclosed except to the following persons:
1. Staff employed by the cabinet, law enforcement officers, and
Commonwealth's and county attorneys who are directly involved in the
investigation or prosecution of the case, including a cabinet
investigation or assessment of child abuse, neglect, and dependency in
accordance with this chapter;
2. Medical and mental health professionals listed by name in a release of
information signed by the guardian of the child, provided that the
information shared is limited to that necessary to promote the physical
or psychological health of the child or to treat the child for abuse-related
symptoms;
3. The court and those persons so authorized by a court order;
4. The external child fatality and near fatality review panel established by
KRS 620.055;
5. The Commonwealth Office of the Ombudsman established pursuant to
Page 44 of 56
XXXX 2/17/2026 11:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1747
KRS 43.035;
6. The parties to an administrative hearing conducted by the cabinet or its
designee in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B in an appeal of a cabinet-
substantiated finding of abuse or neglect. The children's advocacy center
may, in its sole discretion, provide testimony in lieu of files, reports,
notes, photographs, records, electronic and other communications, and
working papers used or developed by the center if the center determines
that the release poses a threat to the safety or well-being of the child, or
would be in the best interests of the child. Following the administrative
hearing and any judicial review, the parties to the administrative hearing
shall return all files, reports, notes, photographs, records, electronic and
other communications, and working papers used or developed by the
children's advocacy center to the center; and
7. A person, agency, or organization engaged in a bona fide research,
quality improvement, or evaluation project having value as determined
by the cabinet. Nothing in this subparagraph shall limit the authority of
the cabinet to decline to share data in cases where it deems a research,
quality improvement, or evaluation project lacks sufficient merit or
value, or the perceived risks are unacceptably high. Data sharing shall
be driven by the aims of advancing human knowledge, complying with
federal requirements, and facilitating future planning for programs that
support families, serve maltreated children, or inform the development
of policy. Data may be shared under this subparagraph provided that the
following conditions are met:
a. The person, agency, or organization enters into a data-use
agreement with the cabinet and complies with the data security
and privacy conditions outlined by the Office of Data Analytics
Page 45 of 56
XXXX 2/17/2026 11:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1747
within the cabinet;
b. Any confidential information provided for a research, quality
improvement, or evaluation project under this subparagraph shall
not be redisclosed. The cabinet shall not share personally
identifiable information under this subparagraph, except in cases
where such information is essential to the completion of the
project. For the purposes of this subdivision, "personally
identifiable information" means the current definition promulgated
by the United States National Institute of Standards and
Technology at the time of data sharing; and
c. If a research or evaluation project results in the publication or
public dissemination of related material, confidential information
provided for a research, quality improvement, or evaluation project
under this subparagraph shall not be disclosed in the results.
(b) The provisions of this subsection shall not be construed as to contravene the
Rules of Criminal Procedure relating to discovery.
(7) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a parent or guardian from accessing records
for his or her child providing that the parent or guardian is not currently under
investigation by a law enforcement agency or the cabinet relating to the abuse or
neglect of a child.
(8) Nothing in this section shall prohibit employees or designated agents of a children's
advocacy center from disclosing information during a multidisciplinary team
review of a child sexual abuse case as set forth under KRS 620.040. Persons
receiving this information shall sign a confidentiality statement consistent with
statutory prohibitions on disclosure of this information.
(9) Employees or designated agents of a children's advocacy center may confirm to
another children's advocacy center that a child has been seen for services. If an
Page 46 of 56
XXXX 2/17/2026 11:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1747
information release has been signed by the guardian of the child, a children's
advocacy center may disclose relevant information to another children's advocacy
center.
(10) (a) An interview of a child recorded at a children's advocacy center shall not be
duplicated, except that the Commonwealth's or county attorney prosecuting
the case may:
1. Make and retain one (1) copy of the interview; and
2. Make one (1) copy for the defendant's or respondent's counsel that the
defendant's or respondent's counsel shall not duplicate.
(b) The defendant's or respondent's counsel shall file the copy with the court clerk
at the close of the case.
(c) Unless objected to by the victim or victims, the court, on its own motion, or
on motion of the attorney for the Commonwealth shall order all recorded
interviews that are introduced into evidence or are in the possession of the
children's advocacy center, law enforcement, the prosecution, or the court to
be sealed.
(d) The provisions of this subsection shall not be construed as to contravene the
Rules of Criminal Procedure relating to discovery.
(11) Identifying information concerning the individual initiating the report under KRS
620.030 shall not be disclosed except:
(a) To law enforcement officials that have a legitimate interest in the case;
(b) To the agency designated by the cabinet to investigate or assess the report;
(c) To members of multidisciplinary teams as defined by KRS 620.020 that
operated under KRS 431.600;
(d) Under a court order, after the court has conducted an in camera review of the
record of the state related to the report and has found reasonable cause to
believe that the reporter knowingly made a false report; or
Page 47 of 56
XXXX 2/17/2026 11:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1747
(e) The external child fatality and near fatality review panel established by KRS
620.055.
(12) (a) Information may be publicly disclosed by the cabinet in a case where child
abuse or neglect has resulted in a child fatality or near fatality.
(b) The cabinet shall conduct an internal review of any case where child abuse or
neglect has resulted in a child fatality or near fatality and the cabinet had prior
involvement with the child or family. The cabinet shall prepare a summary
that includes an account of:
1. The cabinet's actions and any policy or personnel changes taken or to be
taken, including the results of appeals, as a result of the findings from
the internal review; and
2. Any cooperation, assistance, or information from any agency of the state
or any other agency, institution, or facility providing services to the
child or family that were requested and received by the cabinet during
the investigation of a child fatality or near fatality.
(c) The cabinet shall submit a report by September 1 of each year containing an
analysis of all summaries of internal reviews occurring during the previous
year and an analysis of historical trends to the Governor, the General
Assembly, and the state child fatality review team created under KRS
211.684.
(13) When an adult who is the subject of information made confidential by subsection
(5) of this section publicly reveals or causes to be revealed any significant part of
the confidential matter or information, the confidentiality afforded by subsection (5)
of this section is presumed voluntarily waived, and confidential information and
records about the person making or causing the public disclosure, not already
disclosed but related to the information made public, may be disclosed if disclosure
is in the best interest of the child or is necessary for the administration of the
Page 48 of 56
XXXX 2/17/2026 11:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1747
cabinet's duties under this chapter.
(14) (a) As a result of any report of suspected child abuse or neglect:[,]
1. Photographs and X-rays;[ or]
2. A comprehensive urine drug screen using confirmatory methodology
that shall include the following synthetic opioids:
a. Buprenorphine;
b. Fentanyl;
c. Methadone; and
d. Xylazine; or
3. Other appropriate medical diagnostic procedures;
may be taken or caused to be taken, without the consent of the parent or other
person exercising custodial control or supervision of the child, as a part of the
medical evaluation or investigation of these reports.
(b) These photographs and X-rays, comprehensive drug screens, or results of
other medical diagnostic procedures may be introduced into evidence in any
subsequent judicial proceedings or an administrative hearing conducted by the
cabinet or its designee in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B in an appeal of a
cabinet-substantiated finding of child abuse or neglect.
(c) The person performing the diagnostic procedures, [or ]taking photographs or
X-rays, or administering the comprehensive drug screen shall be immune
from criminal or civil liability for having performed the act. Nothing herein
shall limit liability for negligence.
(15) In accordance with 42 U.S.C. sec. 671, the cabinet shall share information about a
child in the custody of the cabinet with a relative or a parent of the child's sibling
for the purposes of:
(a) Evaluating or arranging a placement for the child;
(b) Arranging appropriate treatment services for the child; or
Page 49 of 56
XXXX 2/17/2026 11:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1747
(c) Establishing visitation between the child and a relative, including a sibling of
the child.
(16) In accordance with 42 U.S.C. sec. 671, the cabinet shall, in the case of siblings
removed from their home who are not jointly placed, provide for frequent visitation
or other ongoing interaction between the siblings, unless the cabinet determines that
frequent visitation or other ongoing interaction would be contrary to the safety or
well-being of any of the siblings.
(17) This section shall not be interpreted as prohibiting the Commonwealth Office of the
Ombudsman from reporting pursuant to KRS 43.035 on de-identified information
made confidential by this section.
Section 18. KRS 216B.305 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A[No] person, association, business entity, or organization shall not advertise,
solicit boarders, or operate a boarding home without registering, on an annual basis,
in a manner and form prescribed by the secretary. A[No] person who has been
convicted of a crime of abuse or neglect under KRS 508.100 to 508.120 or who has
had a report of abuse substantiated by the cabinet shall not be registered to operate
a boarding home. The secretary shall impose a fee, not to exceed one hundred
dollars ($100), for this registration.
(2) The secretary shall adopt standards, by administrative regulation pursuant to KRS
Chapter 13A, for the operation of boarding homes. The administrative regulations
shall include minimum requirements in the following areas:
(a) Minimum room sizes for rooms occupied for sleeping purposes. Rooms
occupied by one (1) boarding home resident shall contain at least sixty (60)
square feet of floor space. Rooms occupied by more than one (1) occupant
shall contain at least forty (40) square feet of floor space for each occupant;
(b) Bedding, linens, and laundry services provided to residents;
(c) Sanitary and plumbing fixtures, water supply, sewage disposal, and sanitation
Page 50 of 56
XXXX 2/17/2026 11:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1747
of the premises;
(d) Heating, lighting, and fire prevention, including the installation and
maintenance of smoke detectors;
(e) Maintenance of the building;
(f) Food handling, preparation, and storage, and kitchen sanitation;
(g) Nutritional standards sufficient to meet the boarder's need;
(h) Complaint procedures whereby residents may lodge complaints with the
cabinet concerning the operation of the boarding home; and
(i) Initial and periodic screening procedures to ensure that individuals meet the
definition of "boarder" under KRS 216B.300(3).
(3) Prior to the initial or annual registration of a boarding home, the cabinet shall cause
an unannounced inspection to be made of the boarding home, either by cabinet
personnel or through the local health department acting on behalf of the cabinet, to
determine if the boarding home is in compliance with:
(a) Standards established in subsections (1) and (2) of this section;
(b) Administrative regulations relating to the operation of boarding homes
promulgated pursuant to subsection (2) of this section; and
(c) All applicable local health, fire, building, and safety codes and zoning
ordinances.
(4) (a) A boarding home shall not be registered to any person, association, business
entity, or organization that has been previously penalized for operating a
boarding home without a registration or that has had a previously denied or
revoked registration to operate a boarding home, for a period of five (5) years
following the date of imposition of the previous penalty or denial or
revocation of registration.
(b) A boarding home operator may appeal the cabinet's denial of initial or annual
registration, and an administrative hearing shall be conducted in accordance
Page 51 of 56
XXXX 2/17/2026 11:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1747
with KRS Chapter 13B. A hearing held for a summary suspension shall be
expedited and shall be in accordance with administrative regulations
promulgated by the cabinet. If a boarding home continues to operate in
violation of administrative regulations promulgated pursuant to subsection (2)
of this section, the cabinet shall institute injunctive proceedings in Circuit
Court to terminate the operation of the boarding home.
(5) Any person, association, business entity, or organization that submits an application
to register a boarding home that conceals a previously denied or revoked
application or conceals a penalty received for operating a boarding home without a
registration shall be liable for a civil penalty of at least one thousand dollars
($1,000) but not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000). Any registration issued
in reliance upon the application concealing information shall be immediately
revoked.
(6) Initial and annual registration may be denied and existing registration may be
revoked for any of the following:
(a) The boarding home fails to achieve or maintain substantial and continuing
compliance with administrative regulations promulgated pursuant to
subsection (2) of this section;
(b) The boarding home fails or refuses to correct violations within a reasonable
time as specified by the cabinet; or
(c) The applicant for registration or the registrant has been convicted of a crime
related to abuse, neglect, or exploitation of an adult or has had an incident of
adult abuse, neglect, or exploitation as defined in KRS 209.020, substantiated
by the cabinet.
(7) Employees or designated agents of the cabinet shall have the authority to enter at
any time a boarding home or any premises suspected of operating as an
unregistered boarding home for the purpose of conducting an inspection or
Page 52 of 56
XXXX 2/17/2026 11:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1747
investigating a complaint.
(8) A boarding home shall not handle, store, dispense, or assist with the dispensing of a
boarder's prescription or non-prescription medications.
(9) Upon request of the boarder, the boarding home shall provide access to a lockable
compartment for use by a resident who requests secure storage for prescription
medication.
(10) If a boarding home fails to meet a minimum standard established in subsection (2)
or (3) of this section and is in such a condition that the cabinet determines that the
boarding home's continued operation poses a significant risk to the health and
safety of its residents, the cabinet may summarily suspend the registration of the
boarding home by ordering that its operations cease until corrections are made or
until a hearing is held on the appropriateness of the suspension.
(11) Nothing in this section or KRS 216B.303 shall be construed to prohibit local
governments from imposing requirements on boarding homes that are stricter than
those imposed by administrative regulations of the Cabinet for Health and Family
Services.
Section 19. KRS 439.3401 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "violent offender" means any person who has been
convicted of or pled guilty to the:
(a) Commission or attempted commission of:
1. A capital offense;
2. A Class A felony; or
3. A felony sexual offense described in KRS Chapter 510; or
(b) Commission of:
1. A felony involving the death of the victim or serious physical injury to a
victim;
2. Use of a minor in a sexual performance as described in KRS 531.310;
Page 53 of 56
XXXX 2/17/2026 11:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1747
3. Promoting a sexual performance by a minor as described in KRS
531.320;
4. Unlawful transaction with a minor in the first degree as described in
KRS 530.064(1)(a);
5. Human trafficking under KRS 529.100 involving commercial sexual
activity where the victim is a minor;
6. Criminal abuse or neglect in the first degree as described in KRS
508.100;
7. Burglary in the first degree accompanied by the commission or
attempted commission of an assault as described in KRS 508.010,
508.020, 508.032, or 508.060;
8. Burglary in the first degree accompanied by commission or attempted
commission of kidnapping as described in KRS 509.040;
9. Burglary in the first degree as described in KRS 511.020, if a person
other than a participant in the crime was present in the building during
the commission of the offense;
10. Robbery in the first degree as described in KRS 515.020;
11. Robbery in the second degree as described in KRS 515.030;
12. Incest as described in KRS 530.020(2)(b) or (c);
13. Arson in the first degree as described in KRS 513.020;
14. Strangulation in the first degree as described in KRS 508.170;
15. Carjacking as described in KRS 515.040;
16. A Class C felony violation of promoting contraband in the first degree
as described in KRS 520.050; or
17. Wanton endangerment in the first degree as described in KRS 508.060
involving the discharge of a firearm.
(2) The court shall designate in its judgment if:
Page 54 of 56
XXXX 2/17/2026 11:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1747
(a) The victim suffered death or serious physical injury; and
(b) A person other than a participant in the crime was present in the building
during the commission of burglary in the first degree.
(3) A violent offender who has been convicted of a capital offense and who has
received a life sentence and has not been sentenced to twenty-five (25) years
without parole or imprisonment for life without benefit of probation or parole, or a
Class A felony and receives a life sentence, or to death and his or her sentence is
commuted to a life sentence shall not be released on probation or parole until he or
she has served at least twenty (20) years in the penitentiary. Violent offenders may
have a greater minimum parole eligibility date than other offenders who receive
longer sentences, including a sentence of life imprisonment.
(4) A violent offender with a sentence of a term of years shall not be released on
probation, shock probation, parole, conditional discharge, or other form of early
release until he or she has served at least eighty-five percent (85%) of the sentence
imposed.
(5) A violent offender shall only be awarded credit on his or her sentence authorized by
KRS 197.045(1)(a)1.
(6) This section shall not apply to a person who has been determined by a court to have
been a victim of domestic violence or abuse pursuant to KRS 533.060 with regard
to the offenses involving the death of the victim or serious physical injury to the
victim. The provisions of this subsection shall not extend to rape in the first degree
or sodomy in the first degree by the defendant.
(7) This section shall apply only to those persons who commit offenses after July 15,
1998.
(8) For offenses committed prior to July 15, 1998, the version of this statute in effect
immediately prior to that date shall continue to apply.
(9) The provisions of subsection (1) of this section extending the definition of "violent
Page 55 of 56
XXXX 2/17/2026 11:50 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1747
offender" to persons convicted of or pleading guilty to robbery in the first degree
shall apply only to persons whose crime was committed after July 15, 2002.
Section 20. KRS 507.010 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Abuse or neglect" has the same meaning as in KRS 508.090;
(2) "Criminal homicide" means that a person is guilty of causing the death of another
human being under circumstances which constitute murder, manslaughter in the
first degree, manslaughter in the second degree, or reckless homicide; and
(3) "Physically helpless" and "mentally helpless" have the same meaning as in KRS
508.090.
Section 21. KRS 507.030 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of manslaughter in the first degree when:
(a) With intent to cause serious physical injury to another person, he or she
causes the death of such person or of a third person;
(b) With intent to cause the death of another person, he or she causes the death of
such person or of a third person under circumstances which do not constitute
murder because he or she acts under the influence of extreme emotional
disturbance, as defined in subsection (1)(a) of KRS 507.020;
(c) Through circumstances not otherwise constituting the offense of murder, he or
she intentionally abuses or neglects another person or knowingly permits
another person of whom he or she has actual custody to be abused or
neglected and thereby causes death to a person twelve (12) years of age or
less, or who is physically helpless or mentally helpless; or
(d) He or she knowingly sells fentanyl or a fentanyl derivative to another person,
and the injection, ingestion, inhalation, or other introduction of the fentanyl or
fentanyl derivative causes the death of the person.
(2) Manslaughter in the first degree is a Class B felony.
Page 56 of 56
XXXX 2/17/2026 11:50 AM Jacketed